Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.471

Short title—Effective date—2006 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 900).

This act shall be called the performance audits of government act and takes effect December 8, 2005.

[ 2006 c 1 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 900, approved November 8, 2005).]

NOTES:

Policies and purposes—Construction—Severability—Part headings not law—2006 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 900): See notes following RCW 43.09.470.